test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_kahhaan_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kahhaan: # 1B g-v, CCVV-›CV
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Nom: kahhaan
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Gen: kahhaan
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Acc: kahhaan
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Ill: kaḥanân
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Loc: kaḥanist
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Com: kaḥanáid
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Abe: kahhaanttáá
    kahhaan+N+Ess: kaḥanin
    kahhaan+N+Par: kaḥanid
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Nom: kaḥaneh
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Gen: kaḥanij
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Acc: kaḥanijd
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Ill: kaḥanáid
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Loc: kaḥanijn
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Com: kaḥanijguin
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Abe: kaḥanijttáá
